Hawaii statutes.
[§291D-4] Venue and jurisdiction. (a)
All violations of state law, ordinances, or rules designated as traffic
infractions in this chapter shall be adjudicated in the district and circuit
where the alleged infraction occurred, except as otherwise provided by law.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law,
jurisdiction is in the district court of the circuit where the alleged traffic
infraction occurred. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, district
court judges shall adjudicate traffic infractions. [L 1993, c 214, pt of §2]

Rules of Court

Change of venue, see HCTR rule 11(d).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next